District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0783.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Broadband Price Transparency Regulation Temporary Amendment Act
of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Chapter 39 of Title 28 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read as
follows:
“28-3904a. Special price information standard for broadband services complying with
federal rules.”.
(b) A new section 28-3904a is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 28-3904a. Special price information standard for broadband services complying
with federal rules.


ENGROSSED ORIGINAL
“A merchant providing broadband internet access who complies with the broadband
consumer label requirements of 47 C.F.R. § 8.1 as those requirements existed on January 1,
2026, shall be deemed compliant with the requirements of § 28-3904(a)(12).”.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of the effective date of the Enhancing Consumer Protection
Procedures Amendment Act of 2026, enacted on June 25, 2026 (D.C. Act 26-344; 73 DCR
9162).
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § l-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.